Utah statutes.
34A-1-409.   Partial invalidity -- Saving clause.
Should any section or provision of this title be decided by the courts to be
unconstitutional or invalid the same shall not affect the validity of the
title as a whole or any part of the title other than the part so decided to be
unconstitutional.
